language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0771 Y 56
SFX 0771 ja jach ..
SFX 0771 ja jachmoj ..
SFX 0771 ja jachmy ..
SFX 0771 ja jachu ..
SFX 0771 ja jata ..
SFX 0771 ja jataj ..
SFX 0771 ja jate ..
SFX 0771 ja jateho ..
SFX 0771 ja jatej ..
SFX 0771 ja jateje ..
SFX 0771 ja jateju ..
SFX 0771 ja jatemu ..
SFX 0771 ja jatoh ..
SFX 0771 ja jatom ..
SFX 0771 ja jatu ..
SFX 0771 ja jaty ..
SFX 0771 ja jatych ..
SFX 0771 ja jatym ..
SFX 0771 ja jatymaj ..
SFX 0771 ja jatymi ..
SFX 0771 ja jawši ..
SFX 0771 ja jaći ..
SFX 0771 ja jał ..
SFX 0771 ja jała ..
SFX 0771 ja jałe ..
SFX 0771 ja jało ..
SFX 0771 ja jałoj ..
SFX 0771 ja jeli ..
SFX 0771 ja jeć ..
SFX 0771 ja jeća ..
SFX 0771 ja jećach ..
SFX 0771 ja jećam ..
SFX 0771 ja jeće ..
SFX 0771 ja jećemi ..
SFX 0771 ja jeći ..
SFX 0771 ja jećom ..
SFX 0771 ja jećomaj ..
SFX 0771 ja jećow ..
SFX 0771 ja jeću ..
SFX 0771 ja ještaj ..
SFX 0771 ja ještej ..
SFX 0771 ja ješće ..
SFX 0771 ja ni ..
SFX 0771 ja nimoj ..
SFX 0771 ja nimy ..
SFX 0771 ja nitaj ..
SFX 0771 ja nitej ..
SFX 0771 ja niće ..
SFX 0771 ja nje ..
SFX 0771 ja njemoj ..
SFX 0771 ja njemy ..
SFX 0771 ja njetaj ..
SFX 0771 ja njetej ..
SFX 0771 ja njeće ..
SFX 0771 ja nješ ..
SFX 0771 ja nu ..

SFX 0772 Y 21
SFX 0772 0 je .
SFX 0772 0 jech .
SFX 0772 0 jechmoj .
SFX 0772 0 jechmy .
SFX 0772 0 jechu .
SFX 0772 0 jemoj .
SFX 0772 0 jemy .
SFX 0772 0 jetaj .
SFX 0772 0 jetej .
SFX 0772 0 jeće .
SFX 0772 0 ješ .
SFX 0772 0 ješe .
SFX 0772 0 ještaj .
SFX 0772 0 ještej .
SFX 0772 0 ješće .
SFX 0772 0 moj .
SFX 0772 0 my .
SFX 0772 0 taj .
SFX 0772 0 tej .
SFX 0772 0 u .
SFX 0772 0 će .

SFX 0773 Y 11
SFX 0773 a ach .
SFX 0773 a aj .
SFX 0773 a am .
SFX 0773 a ami .
SFX 0773 a ej .
SFX 0773 a o .
SFX 0773 a ojo .
SFX 0773 a om .
SFX 0773 a omaj .
SFX 0773 a ow .
SFX 0773 a źe .

SFX 0774 Y 11
SFX 0774 ój oja ..
SFX 0774 ój ojach ..
SFX 0774 ój ojam ..
SFX 0774 ój ojej ..
SFX 0774 ój ojemi ..
SFX 0774 ój ojo ..
SFX 0774 ój ojojo ..
SFX 0774 ój ojom ..
SFX 0774 ój ojomaj ..
SFX 0774 ój ojow ..
SFX 0774 ój oju ..

SFX 0775 Y 8
SFX 0775 el lach ..
SFX 0775 el lam ..
SFX 0775 el le ..
SFX 0775 el lemi ..
SFX 0775 el li ..
SFX 0775 el lomaj ..
SFX 0775 el low ..
SFX 0775 el lu ..

SFX 0776 Y 10
SFX 0776 ŕ rja .
SFX 0776 ŕ rjach .
SFX 0776 ŕ rjam .
SFX 0776 ŕ rjej .
SFX 0776 ŕ rjemi .
SFX 0776 ŕ rjo .
SFX 0776 ŕ rjom .
SFX 0776 ŕ rjomaj .
SFX 0776 ŕ rjow .
SFX 0776 ŕ rju .

SFX 0777 Y 13
SFX 0777 ge gach ..
SFX 0777 ge gaj ..
SFX 0777 ge gam ..
SFX 0777 ge gami ..
SFX 0777 ge geho ..
SFX 0777 ge gemu ..
SFX 0777 ge gi ..
SFX 0777 ge gim ..
SFX 0777 ge gojo ..
SFX 0777 ge gomaj ..
SFX 0777 ge gow ..
SFX 0777 ge gu ..
SFX 0777 ge ze ..

SFX 0778 Y 12
SFX 0778 óft ofta ...
SFX 0778 óft oftach ...
SFX 0778 óft oftaj ...
SFX 0778 óft oftam ...
SFX 0778 óft oftami ...
SFX 0778 óft oftej ...
SFX 0778 óft ofto ...
SFX 0778 óft oftom ...
SFX 0778 óft oftomaj ...
SFX 0778 óft oftow ...
SFX 0778 óft ofty ...
SFX 0778 óft ofće ...

SFX 0779 Y 8
SFX 0779 e ach .
SFX 0779 e am .
SFX 0779 e ami .
SFX 0779 e omaj .
SFX 0779 e ow .
SFX 0779 e u .
SFX 0779 e y .
SFX 0779 e źe .

SFX 0780 Y 12
SFX 0780 e eho .
SFX 0780 e ej .
SFX 0780 e eju .
SFX 0780 e emu .
SFX 0780 e oh .
SFX 0780 e om .
SFX 0780 e y .
SFX 0780 e ych .
SFX 0780 e yj .
SFX 0780 e ym .
SFX 0780 e ymaj .
SFX 0780 e ymi .

SFX 0781 Y 8
SFX 0781 he hach ..
SFX 0781 he ham ..
SFX 0781 he hami ..
SFX 0781 he hi ..
SFX 0781 he homaj ..
SFX 0781 he how ..
SFX 0781 he hu ..
SFX 0781 he ze ..

SFX 0782 Y 9
SFX 0782 e aja .
SFX 0782 e ej .
SFX 0782 e eje .
SFX 0782 e eju .
SFX 0782 e u .
SFX 0782 e ych .
SFX 0782 e ym .
SFX 0782 e ymaj .
SFX 0782 e ymi .

SFX 0783 Y 8
SFX 0783 0 wach .
SFX 0783 0 wam .
SFX 0783 0 wami .
SFX 0783 0 wje .
SFX 0783 0 womaj .
SFX 0783 0 wow .
SFX 0783 0 wu .
SFX 0783 0 wy .

SFX 0784 Y 10
SFX 0784 0 a .
SFX 0784 0 ach .
SFX 0784 0 am .
SFX 0784 0 ami .
SFX 0784 0 o .
SFX 0784 0 om .
SFX 0784 0 omaj .
SFX 0784 0 ow .
SFX 0784 0 u .
SFX 0784 0 źe .

SFX 0785 Y 9
SFX 0785 a ach .
SFX 0785 a am .
SFX 0785 a ami .
SFX 0785 a e .
SFX 0785 a o .
SFX 0785 a om .
SFX 0785 a omaj .
SFX 0785 a ow .
SFX 0785 a u .

SFX 0786 Y 8
SFX 0786 ce ka ..
SFX 0786 ce kach ..
SFX 0786 ce kam ..
SFX 0786 ce kami ..
SFX 0786 ce komaj ..
SFX 0786 ce kow ..
SFX 0786 ce ku ..
SFX 0786 ce ky ..

SFX 0787 Y 4
SFX 0787 i ach .
SFX 0787 i am .
SFX 0787 i emi .
SFX 0787 i o .

SFX 0788 Y 9
SFX 0788 k ce .
SFX 0788 k ka .
SFX 0788 k kach .
SFX 0788 k kam .
SFX 0788 k kami .
SFX 0788 k ki .
SFX 0788 k komaj .
SFX 0788 k kow .
SFX 0788 k ku .

SFX 0789 Y 68
SFX 0789 ń aca .
SFX 0789 ń acaj .
SFX 0789 ń ace .
SFX 0789 ń aceho .
SFX 0789 ń acej .
SFX 0789 ń aceje .
SFX 0789 ń aceju .
SFX 0789 ń acemu .
SFX 0789 ń ach .
SFX 0789 ń achmoj .
SFX 0789 ń achmy .
SFX 0789 ń achu .
SFX 0789 ń acoh .
SFX 0789 ń acom .
SFX 0789 ń acu .
SFX 0789 ń acy .
SFX 0789 ń acych .
SFX 0789 ń acym .
SFX 0789 ń acymaj .
SFX 0789 ń acymi .
SFX 0789 ń ata .
SFX 0789 ń ataj .
SFX 0789 ń ate .
SFX 0789 ń ateho .
SFX 0789 ń atej .
SFX 0789 ń ateje .
SFX 0789 ń ateju .
SFX 0789 ń atemu .
SFX 0789 ń atoh .
SFX 0789 ń atom .
SFX 0789 ń atu .
SFX 0789 ń aty .
SFX 0789 ń atych .
SFX 0789 ń atym .
SFX 0789 ń atymaj .
SFX 0789 ń atymi .
SFX 0789 ń ał .
SFX 0789 ń ała .
SFX 0789 ń ałe .
SFX 0789 ń ało .
SFX 0789 ń ałoj .
SFX 0789 ń ejo .
SFX 0789 ń eli .
SFX 0789 ń eć .
SFX 0789 ń eći .
SFX 0789 ń eše .
SFX 0789 ń eštaj .
SFX 0789 ń eštej .
SFX 0789 ń ešće .
SFX 0789 ń ni .
SFX 0789 ń nimoj .
SFX 0789 ń nimy .
SFX 0789 ń nitaj .
SFX 0789 ń nitej .
SFX 0789 ń niće .
SFX 0789 ń nje .
SFX 0789 ń njemoj .
SFX 0789 ń njemy .
SFX 0789 ń njetaj .
SFX 0789 ń njetej .
SFX 0789 ń njeće .
SFX 0789 ń nješ .
SFX 0789 ń nu .
SFX 0789 ń ńmoj .
SFX 0789 ń ńmy .
SFX 0789 ń ńtaj .
SFX 0789 ń ńtej .
SFX 0789 ń ńće .
