language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.dic
Boda/0773
Bode/0779
Bohabój/0774
Christel/0775
Dytaŕ/0776
Frida/0773
Grozne/0780
Guida/0773
Gundel/0775
Hage/0777
Helge/0777
Jade/0779
Nahe/0781
Nowe/0782
Oskaŕ/0776
Rikarda/0773
Sewjerne/0782
Uda/0773
Wałtaŕ/0776
Zschopau/0783
blid/0784
bydlenišća/0785
lóft/0778
matadorce/0786
njewotepja/0771
njezapočń/0789
njezepja/0771
njećep/0772
online-masce/0786
solo-travellerce/0786
stasi-ludźi/0787
wotepja/0771
započń/0789
zepja/0771
ćep/0772
štuk/0788
